Florida, session 2026, SB1128.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSubsection (10) is added to section 61.13, 29 Florida Statutes, to read: 30 61.13âSupport of children; parenting and time-sharing; 31 powers of court; evidentiary hearing reports.â 32 (10)(a)âThe following time-sharing matters must be accorded 33 priority on the courtâs calendar: 34 1.âAn evidentiary hearing on an initial verified motion 35 affirmatively seeking to establish temporary parental 36 responsibility and time-sharing. Such motion must be filed 37 separately from the initial petition for dissolution or petition 38 to establish paternity, as applicable. The initiating party must 39 attach a proposed temporary parenting plan to the motion. The 40 responding party must file and serve a proposed temporary 41 parenting plan within 10 days after receipt of service of the 42 verified motion and attached proposed temporary parenting plan. 43 However, failure of the responding party to file or serve a 44 proposed temporary parenting plan is not a bar to moving forward 45 on the motion. Portions of the proposed temporary parenting 46 plans which are not in dispute must be adopted as a voluntary 47 agreed schedule between the parties. Absent good cause, the 48 court shall conduct a hearing on the contested issues within 30 49 days after the motion is served. The court may not refer the 50 parties to mediation as a condition precedent to the court 51 setting or conducting a hearing unless the court has the consent 52 of both parties. The court shall issue an order on temporary 53 parental responsibility and time-sharing within 30 days after 54 the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing. 55 2.âAn evidentiary hearing on a motion to enforce compliance 56 with an existing time-sharing order. The court shall conduct a 57 hearing on a motion seeking to enforce compliance with an 58 existing time-sharing order within 5 business days after the 59 motion is served. If the judge assigned to the case is not able 60 to conduct the hearing within 5 business days, an available 61 family division judge must conduct the hearing during regular 62 business hours. The court shall issue an order within 5 days 63 after the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing. 64 (b)1.âBeginning July 1, 2027, and annually each July 1 65 thereafter, the Office of the State Courts Administrator shall 66 prepare and publish on its website a publicly accessible annual 67 report on evidentiary hearings held under paragraph (a) in each 68 judicial circuit. The report must include, at a minimum, all of 69 the following: 70 a.âThe number of evidentiary hearings held under 71 subparagraphs (a)1. and 2. 72 b.âThe average time from the filing of a motion to the 73 issue of an order. 74 c.âRates of compliance with the statutory timeframes for 75 rulings on motions. 76 2.âUpon publication, the Office of the State Courts 77 Administrator shall submit the report to the President of the 78 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 79 3.âReports prepared under this paragraph may not contain 80 personal identifying information of litigants or minor children. 81 4.âThe Supreme Court may adopt rules to implement this 82 paragraph, including data collection and reporting standards. 83 Section 2.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 742.031, 84 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 85 742.031âHearings; court orders for support, hospital 86 expenses, and attorney fees.â 87 (1)âHearings for the purpose of establishing or refuting 88 the allegations of the complaint and answer must be held in the 89 chambers and may be restricted to persons, in addition to the 90 parties involved and their counsel, as the judge in his or her 91 discretion may direct. The court shall determine the issues of 92 paternity of the child and the ability of the parties parents to 93 support the child. Each partyâs social security number must be 94 recorded in the file containing the adjudication of paternity. 95 If the court finds that the alleged father is the father of the 96 child, it must so order. If appropriate, the court may order the 97 father to pay the complainant, her guardian, or any other person 98 assuming responsibility for the child moneys sufficient to pay 99 reasonable attorney fees, hospital or medical expenses, cost of 100 confinement, and any other expenses incident to the birth of the 101 child and to pay all costs of the proceeding. Bills for 102 pregnancy, childbirth, and scientific testing are admissible as 103 evidence without requiring third-party foundation testimony and 104 constitute prima facie evidence of amounts incurred for such 105 services or for testing on behalf of the child. The court shall 106 order either or both parties parents owing a duty of support to 107 the child to pay support under chapter 61. The court must issue, 108 upon motion by a party, a temporary order requiring child 109 support for a minor child under s. 61.30 pending an 110 administrative or judicial determination of parentage if there 111 is clear and convincing evidence of paternity on the basis of 112 genetic tests or other evidence. The court shall may also make a 113 determination of an appropriate parenting plan, including a 114 time-sharing schedule, in accordance with chapter 61. 115 (2)âIf a judgment of paternity contains only a child 116 support award with no parenting plan or time-sharing schedule, 117 the obligee parent shall receive all of the time-sharing and 118 sole parental responsibility without prejudice to the obligor 119 parent. If a paternity judgment contains no such provisions, the 120 mother shall be presumed to have all of the time-sharing and 121 sole parental responsibility. 122 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.